Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.040

Transactions and contracts exempt from prohibition under RCW 21.30.020—Rules.

(1) The prohibition in RCW 21.30.020 does not apply to the following:

(a) An account, agreement, or transaction within the exclusive jurisdiction of the commodity futures trading commission as granted under the commodity exchange act;

(b) A commodity contract for the purchase of one or more precious metals in which, within seven calendar days from the payment in good funds of any portion of the purchase price, the quantity of precious metals purchased by the payment is delivered (whether in specifically segregated or fungible bulk form) into the possession of a depository (other than the seller) which is either (i) a financial institution, (ii) a depository the warehouse receipts of which are recognized for delivery purposes for any commodity on a contract market designated by the commodity futures trading commission, (iii) a storage facility licensed or regulated by the United States or any agency thereof, or (iv) a depository designated by the director, and the depository (or other person which itself qualifies as a depository as aforesaid) issues and the purchaser receives, a certificate, document of title, confirmation, or other instrument evidencing that the quantity of precious metals has been delivered to the depository and is being and will continue to be held by the depository on the purchaser's behalf, free and clear of all liens and encumbrances, other than liens of the purchaser, tax liens, liens agreed to by the purchaser, or liens of the depository for fees and expenses, which have previously been disclosed to the purchaser;

(c) A commodity contract solely between persons engaged in producing, processing, using commercially, or handling as merchants each commodity subject thereto, or any by-products thereof; or

(d) A commodity contract under which the offeree or the purchaser is a person referred to in RCW 21.30.030, a person registered with the federal securities and exchange commission as a broker-dealer, an insurance company, an investment company as defined in the federal investment company act of 1940, or an employee pension and profit sharing or benefit plan (other than a self-employed individual retirement plan, or individual retirement account).

(2) The director may issue rules or orders prescribing the terms and conditions of all transactions and contracts covered by this chapter which are not within the exclusive jurisdiction of the commodity futures trading commission as granted by the commodity exchange act, exempting any person or transaction from any provision of this chapter conditionally or unconditionally and otherwise implementing this chapter for the protection of purchasers and sellers of commodities.

[ 1987 c 243 s 4; 1986 c 14 s 4.]